pt-PT: Serviços > Serviços de construção: Construção comercial; Construção exterior; Construção e renovação residencial; Serviços de construção especializados
fi: Huollot > Rakennus- ja rakentamispalvelut: Kaupallinen rakentaminen; Ulkorakentaminen; Asuinrakentaminen ja asuntojen remontointi; Erikoisrakennuspalvelut
hu: Szolgáltatások > Építőipari szolgáltatások: Kereskedelmi építkezés; Kültéri építkezés; Lakóépületek építése és felújítása; Speciális építőipari szolgáltatások
th: บริการ > บริการอาคารและการก่อสร้าง: การก่อสร้างเชิงพาณิชย์; การก่อสร้างกลางแจ้ง; การก่อสร้างและปรับปรุงที่อยู่อาศัย; บริการก่อสร้างเฉพาะทาง
pl: Usługi > Usługi budowlane i konstrukcyjne: Budownictwo komercyjne; Konstrukcja zewnętrzna; Budowa i renowacja budynków mieszkalnych; Specjalistyczne usługi budowlane
zh-CN: 服务 > 建筑构造服务: 商业建筑; 户外建筑; 住宅建筑/装修; 专业建筑服务
el: Υπηρεσίες > Υπηρεσίες οικοδομής & κατασκευών: Εμπορικές κατασκευές; Κατασκευές εξωτερικού χώρου; Κατοικίες & ανακαινίσεις κατοικιών; Εξειδικευμένες υπηρεσίες κατασκευών
lt-LT: Paslaugos > Statybos paslaugos: Komercinė statyba; Lauko statyba; Gyvenamųjų namų statyba ir renovacija; Specializuotos statybos paslaugos
da: Service > Bygge- og anlægsydelser: Erhvervsbyggeri; Udendørs byggeri; Boligbyggeri og renovering; Specialiseret byggeservice
sk-SK: Servis > Stavebníctvo a výstavba: Komerčná výstavba; Externá výstavba; Výstavba a renovácia bytov; Špecializované stavebné služby
cs: Služby > Služby v oblasti stavebnictví: Výstavba komerčních objektů; Venkovní stavby; Bytová výstavba a renovace; Specializované služby v oblasti stavebnictví
ru: Услуги > Строительные услуги: Коммерческое строительство; Строительство наружных объектов; Жилищное строительство и капитальный ремонт; Специализированные строительные работы
pt-BR: Serviços > Serviços de construção e edificação: Construção comercial; Construção ao ar livre; Construção e reforma residencial; Serviços especializados de construção
ro-RO: Servicii > Servicii de construcții: Construcții comerciale; Construcții de exterior; Construcții și renovări spații rezidențiale; Servicii construcții specializate
fr: Services > Services de bâtiment et de construction: Construction commerciale; Construction extérieure; Construction résidentielle et rénovation; Services de construction spécialisés
bg-BG: Услуги > Строителни услуги и конструкции: Строителство на търговски обекти; Външни конструкции; Жилищно строителство и ремонт; Специализирани строителни услуги
de: Dienstleistungen > Bau- & Konstruktionsdienstleistungen: Gewerbebau; Außenbau; Wohnbau und -renovierung; Spezialisierte Baudienstleistungen
vi: Dịch vụ > Dịch vụ chế tạo & xây dựng: Công trình thương mại; Xây dựng ngoài trời; Xây dựng & cải tạo nhà ở; Dịch vụ xây dựng chuyên biệt
sv: Tjänster > Bygg- och anläggningstjänster: Kommersiellt byggande; Utomhusbyggnation; Bostadsbyggnation och renovering; Specialiserade byggtjänster
tr: Servisler > İnşaat ve İnşaat Hizmetleri: Ticari İnşaat; Dış Mekan İnşaatı; Konut İnşaatı ve Tadilat; Özel İnşaat Hizmetleri
nl: Diensten > Bouwdiensten: Commerciële bouw; Buitenbouw; Residentiële bouw en renovatie; Gespecialiseerde bouwdiensten
es: Servicios > Servicios de edificación y construcción: Construcción comercial; Servicios de construcción exterior; Construcción y renovación residencial; Servicios de construcción especializados
en: Services > Building & Construction Services: Commercial Construction; Outdoor Construction; Residential Construction & Renovation; Specialized Construction Services
ko: 서비스 > 건축/건설 서비스: 상업용 건설; 옥외 건설; 주거용 건축/개조; 특수 건설 서비스
hr-HR: Usluge > Građevinske usluge: Komercijalna gradnja; Vanjska gradnja; Izgradnja i renoviranje stanova; Specijalizirane građevinske usluge
sl-SI: Storitve > Gradbene in gradbeniške storitve: Komercialna gradnja; Zunanja gradnja; Stanovanjska gradnja in prenova; Specializirane gradbene storitve
it: Servizi > Servizi per l'edilizia e le costruzioni: Edilizia commerciale; Edilizia outdoor; Edilizia e ristrutturazione residenziale; Servizi edili specializzati
zh-TW: 維修 > 營建服務: 商業建設; 戶外建設; 住宅建設/整修; 專業施工服務
ja: サービス > ビル・建造物の保守点検: 商業施設; 屋外工事; 住宅工事&改築; 特殊な建造物の保守点検
nb: Tjenester > Bygg- og anleggstjenester: Kommersielle byggtjenester; Utendørsbygging; Boligbygging og renovering; Spesialiserte byggetjenester